District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.13

Third-party administration.

The Department may contract with one or more third parties to administer any or all components of AccessRx, including outreach, eligibility, claims, administration, and rebate recovery and redistribution.

History

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 113, 51 DCR 3688